Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 61. Excise Tax on Marijuana.

Effective dates. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this chapter, took effect February 24, 2015.

Sec. 43.61.010.
Marijuana tax.

An excise tax is imposed on the sale or transfer of marijuana from a marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana store or marijuana product manufacturing facility. Every marijuana cultivation facility shall pay an excise tax at the rate of $50 per ounce, or proportionate part thereof, on marijuana that is sold or transferred from a marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana store or marijuana product manufacturing facility.

The department may exempt certain parts of the marijuana plant from the excise tax described in (a) of this section or may establish a rate lower than $50 per ounce for certain parts of the marijuana plant.

The recidivism reduction fund is established in the general fund. The Department of Administration shall separately account for 50 percent of the tax collected under this section and deposit it into the recidivism reduction fund.

The legislature may use the annual estimated balance in the recidivism reduction fund to make appropriations to the Department of Corrections, the Department of Health and Social Services, or the Department of Public Safety for recidivism reduction programs.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

The marijuana education and treatment fund is established in the general fund. In addition to the accounting under (c) of this section, the Department of Administration shall separately account for 25 percent of the tax collected under this section and deposit it into the marijuana education and treatment fund. The Department of Administration shall deposit interest earned on the fund into the general fund. Money in the fund does not lapse. The legislature may use the annual estimated balance in the fund to make appropriations to the Department of Health and Social Services for the comprehensive marijuana use education and treatment program established under AS

44.29.020(a)(17)

.

History.

(§ 2, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 162 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 8, 9 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding taxes collected under this section, see sec. 1, ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, added (c), (d) and (e).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, in (d), inserted “recidivism reduction” following “annual estimated balance in the”; added (f).

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 43.61.020.
Monthly statement and payments.

Each marijuana cultivation facility shall send a statement by mail or electronically to the department on or before the last day of each calendar month. The statement must contain an account of the amount of marijuana sold or transferred to retail marijuana stores and marijuana product manufacturing facilities in the state during the preceding month, setting out

the total number of ounces, including fractional ounces, sold or transferred;

the names and Alaska address of each buyer and transferee; and

the weight of marijuana sold or transferred to the respective buyers or transferees.

The marijuana cultivation facility shall pay monthly to the department, all taxes, computed at the rates prescribed in this chapter, on the respective total quantities of the marijuana sold or transferred during the preceding month. The monthly return shall be filed and the tax paid on or before the last day of each month to cover the preceding month.

History.

(§ 2, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2014, in subparagraph (a)(1), a comma was inserted following “fractional ounces” to conform the punctuation to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 43.61.030.
Administration and enforcement of tax.

Delinquent payments under this chapter shall subject the marijuana cultivation facility to civil penalties under AS

43.05.220

.

If a marijuana cultivation facility fails to pay the tax to the state the marijuana cultivation facility’s registration may be revoked in accordance with procedures established under AS

17.38.190(a)(1)

.

History.

(§ 2, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”